Washington statutes.
RCW 15.140.080

Hemp regulatory account.

The hemp regulatory account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fees established under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for implementing this chapter. Only the director of the state department of agriculture or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2019 c 158 s 8.]